Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 510.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of rape in the first degree when:
(a) He or she engages in sexual intercourse with another person by forcible
compulsion; or
(b) He or she engages in sexual intercourse with another person who is incapable
of consent because he or she:
1. Is physically helpless; or
2. Is less than twelve (12) years old.
(2) Rape in the first degree is a Class B felony unless the victim:
(a) Receives a serious physical injury, in which case it is a Class A felony; or
(b) Is under twelve (12) years old, in which case it is a capital offense[ is under
twelve (12) years old or receives a serious physical injury in which case it is a
Class A felony].
Section 2. KRS 510.070 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sodomy in the first degree when:
(a) He or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse with another person by
forcible compulsion; or
(b) He or she engages in deviate sexual intercourse with another person who is
incapable of consent because he or she:
1. Is physically helpless; or
2. Is less than twelve (12) years old.
(2) Sodomy in the first degree is a Class B felony unless the victim:
(a) Receives a serious physical injury, in which case it is a Class A felony; or
(b) Is under twelve (12) years old, in which case it is a capital offense[ is under
twelve (12) years old or receives a serious physical injury in which case it is a
Page 1 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
Class A felony].
Section 3. KRS 510.110 is amended to read as follows:
(1) A person is guilty of sexual abuse in the first degree when:
(a) He or she subjects another person to sexual contact by forcible compulsion; or
(b) He or she subjects another person to sexual contact who is incapable of
consent because he or she:
1. Is physically helpless;
2. Is less than twelve (12) years old;
3. Is mentally incapacitated; or
4. Is an individual with an intellectual disability; or
(c) Being twenty-one (21) years old or more, he or she:
1. Subjects another person who is less than sixteen (16) years old to sexual
contact;
2. Engages in masturbation in the presence of another person who is less
than sixteen (16) years old and knows or has reason to know the other
person is present; or
3. Engages in masturbation while using the internet, telephone, or other
electronic communication device while communicating with a minor
who the person knows is less than sixteen (16) years old, and the minor
can see or hear the person masturbate; or
(d) Being a person in a position of authority or position of special trust, as defined
in KRS 532.045, he or she, regardless of his or her age, subjects a minor who
is less than eighteen (18) years old, with whom he or she comes into contact
as a result of that position, to sexual contact or engages in masturbation in the
presence of the minor and knows or has reason to know the minor is present
or engages in masturbation while using the internet, telephone, or other
electronic communication device while communicating with a minor who the
Page 2 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
person knows is less than sixteen (16) years old, and the minor can see or hear
the person masturbate.
(2) Sexual abuse in the first degree is a Class D felony, unless the victim is less than
twelve (12) years old, in which case the offense shall be a capital offense[Class C
felony].
Section 4. KRS 532.025 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Upon conviction of a defendant in cases where the death penalty may be
imposed, a hearing shall be conducted. In the[such] hearing, the judge shall
hear additional evidence in extenuation, mitigation, and aggravation of
punishment, including the record of any prior criminal convictions and pleas
of guilty or pleas of nolo contendere of the defendant, or the absence of any
prior conviction and pleas.[; provided, however, that] Only the[such] evidence
in aggravation as the Commonwealth[state] has made known to the defendant
prior to his or her trial shall be admissible. Subject to the Kentucky Rules of
Evidence, juvenile court records of adjudications of guilt of a child for an
offense that would be a felony if committed by an adult shall be admissible in
court at any time the child is tried as an adult, or after the child becomes an
adult, at any subsequent criminal trial relating to that same person. Juvenile
court records made available pursuant to this section may be used for
impeachment purposes during a criminal trial and may be used during the
sentencing phase of a criminal trial; however, the fact that a juvenile has been
adjudicated delinquent of an offense that would be a felony if the child had
been an adult shall not be used in finding the child to be a persistent felony
offender based upon that adjudication. Release of the child's treatment,
medical, mental, or psychological records is prohibited unless presented as
evidence in Circuit Court. Release of any records resulting from the child's
prior abuse and neglect under Title IV-E or IV-B of the Federal Social
Page 3 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
Security Act is also prohibited. The judge shall also hear argument by the
defendant or his or her counsel and the prosecuting attorney, as provided by
law, regarding the punishment to be imposed. The prosecuting attorney shall
open and the defendant shall conclude the argument. In cases in which the
death penalty may be imposed, the judge when sitting without a jury shall
follow the additional procedure provided in subsection (2) of this section.
Upon the conclusion of the evidence and arguments, the judge shall impose
the sentence or shall recess the trial for the purpose of taking the sentence
within the limits prescribed by law. If the trial court is reversed on appeal
because of error only in the presentence hearing, the new trial which may be
ordered shall apply only to the issue of punishment.
(b) In all cases in which the death penalty may be imposed and which are tried by
a jury, upon a return of a verdict of guilty by the jury, the court shall resume
the trial and conduct a presentence hearing before the jury. The[Such] hearing
shall be conducted in the same manner as presentence hearings conducted
before the judge as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, including the
record of any prior criminal convictions and pleas of guilty or pleas of nolo
contendere of the defendant. Upon the conclusion of the evidence and
arguments, the judge shall give the jury appropriate instructions, and the jury
shall retire to determine whether any mitigating or aggravating circumstances,
as defined in subsection (2) of this section, exist and to recommend a sentence
for the defendant. Upon the findings of the jury, the judge shall fix a sentence
within the limits prescribed by law.
(2) In all cases of offenses for which the death penalty may be authorized, the judge
shall consider, or include in his or her instructions to the jury for it to consider, any
mitigating circumstances or aggravating circumstances otherwise authorized by law
and any of the following statutory aggravating or mitigating circumstances which
Page 4 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
may be supported by the evidence:
(a) Aggravating circumstances:
1. The offense of murder or kidnapping was committed by a person with a
prior record of conviction for a capital offense, or the offense of murder
was committed by a person who has a substantial history of serious
assaultive criminal convictions;
2. The offense of murder or kidnapping was committed while the offender
was engaged in the commission of arson in the first degree, robbery in
the first degree, burglary in the first degree, rape in the first degree, or
sodomy in the first degree;
3. The offender by his or her act of murder, armed robbery, or kidnapping
knowingly created a great risk of death to more than one (1) person in a
public place by means of a weapon of mass destruction, weapon, or
other device which would normally be hazardous to the lives of more
than one (1) person;
4. The offender committed the offense of murder for himself, herself, or
another, for the purpose of receiving money or any other thing of
monetary value, or for other profit;
5. The offense of murder was committed by a person who was a prisoner
and the victim was a prison employee engaged at the time of the act in
the performance of his or her duties;
6. The offender's act or acts of killing were intentional and resulted in
multiple deaths;
7. The offender's act of killing was intentional and the victim was:
a. A state or local public official; or
b. A first responder, as defined in KRS 507.070;
8. The offender murdered the victim when an emergency protective order
Page 5 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
or a domestic violence order was in effect, or when any other order
designed to protect the victim from the offender, such as an order issued
as a condition of a bond, conditional release, probation, parole, or
pretrial diversion, was in effect;[ and]
9. The offender's act of killing was intentional and resulted in the death of
a child under twelve (12) years old; and
10. The offense of rape in the first degree, sodomy in the first degree, or
sexual abuse in the first degree was committed against a child under
twelve (12) years old.
(b) Mitigating circumstances:
1. The defendant has no significant history of prior criminal activity;
2. The capital offense was committed while the defendant was under the
influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance even though the
influence of extreme mental or emotional disturbance is not sufficient to
constitute a defense to the crime;
3. The victim was a participant in the defendant's criminal conduct or
consented to the criminal act;
4. The capital offense was committed under circumstances which the
defendant believed to provide a moral justification or extenuation for his
or her conduct even though the circumstances which the defendant
believed to provide a moral justification or extenuation for his or her
conduct are not sufficient to constitute a defense to the crime;
5. The defendant was an accomplice in a capital offense committed by
another person and his or her participation in the capital offense was
relatively minor;
6. The defendant acted under duress or under the domination of another
person even though the duress or the domination of another person is not
Page 6 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1825
sufficient to constitute a defense to the crime;
7. At the time of the capital offense, the capacity of the defendant to
appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct to the requirements of
law was impaired as a result of mental illness or an intellectual disability
or intoxication even though the impairment of the capacity of the
defendant to appreciate the criminality of his or her conduct or to
conform the conduct to the requirements of law is insufficient to
constitute a defense to the crime; and
8. The youth of the defendant at the time of the crime.
(3) The instructions as determined by the trial judge to be warranted by the evidence or
as required by KRS 532.030(4) shall be given in charge and in writing to the jury
for its deliberation. The jury, if its verdict be a recommendation of death, or
imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole, or imprisonment for
life without benefit of probation or parole until the defendant has served a minimum
of twenty-five (25) years of his or her sentence, shall designate in writing, signed by
the foreman of the jury, the aggravating circumstance or circumstances which it
found beyond a reasonable doubt. In nonjury cases, the judge shall make such
designation. In all cases unless at least one (1) of the statutory aggravating
circumstances enumerated in subsection (2) of this section is so found, the death
penalty, or imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole, or the
sentence to imprisonment for life without benefit of probation or parole until the
defendant has served a minimum of twenty-five (25) years of his or her sentence,
shall not be imposed.
Page 7 of 7
XXXX 1/15/2026 11:27 AM Jacketed